Maryland, session 2026, SB0369.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
12–104.
(a) In this section, “housing authority entity” means an entity:
(1) that is controlled or wholly owned by an authority; or
(2) in which an authority or an entity controlled or wholly owned by an
authority has an ownership interest, either directly or indirectly, through one or more
wholly or partially owned subsidiary entities.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0369*

SENATE BILL 369
(b) A nonprofit entity shall be deemed controlled by an authority under subsection
(a) of this section if:
(1) the nonprofit entity is established by an authority under § 12–502(h) of
this title; and
(2) the authority:
(i) has the power to appoint a majority of the board of directors of
the nonprofit entity; or
(ii) is the sole member of the nonprofit entity.
(c) (1) In this subsection, “nonprofit housing corporation” means a [nonprofit
or charitable private corporation that provides safe and sanitary housing to persons of
eligible income in such a way that the corporation works essentially like an authority under
this Division II] CORPORATION:
(I) INCORPORATED UNDER THE LAWS OF THE STATE OR
AUTHORIZED TO DO BUSINESS IN THE STATE BY THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF
ASSESSMENTS AND TAXATION;
(II) RECOGNIZED BY THE INTERNAL REVENUE SERVICE AS AN
ORGANIZATION DESCRIBED IN § 501(C)(3) OF THE INTERNAL REVENUE CODE; AND
(III) ORGANIZED AND OPERATED FOR THE PRIMARY PURPOSE OF
DEVELOPING, OWNING, OR OPERATING HOUSING FOR PERSONS OF ELIGIBLE
INCOME.
(2) Property is used for essential public and governmental OR
CHARITABLE purposes and is exempt from all taxes and special assessments of the State
or a political subdivision if the property:
(i) belongs to an authority or a nonprofit housing corporation;
(ii) is used as housing for persons of eligible income and is owned in
whole or in part, directly or indirectly, through one or more wholly or partially owned
subsidiary entities of a housing authority entity OR NONPROFIT HOUSING
CORPORATION; or
(iii) 1. is used, or if planned or under construction will be used,
as housing for persons of eligible income and is owned in whole or in part, directly or
indirectly, through one or more wholly or partially owned subsidiary entities of a housing
authority entity OR NONPROFIT HOUSING CORPORATION; and

SENATE BILL 369 3
2. has improvements, or has improvements planned or under
construction, located on land that is owned by:
A. an authority OR A NONPROFIT HOUSING
CORPORATION; or
B. an entity that is controlled or wholly owned by an
authority OR A NONPROFIT HOUSING CORPORATION.
(3) In lieu of those taxes and special assessments, an authority, a nonprofit
housing corporation, or a housing authority entity shall pay the political subdivision in
which a housing project is wholly or partly located an amount, if any, that may be set by
mutual agreement and that does not exceed the amount of regular taxes levied on similar
property.
(d) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) or (3) of this subsection:
(i) all real property of an authority is exempt from levy and sale by
virtue of an execution;
(II) ALL REAL PROPERTY OF A NONPROFIT HOUSING
CORPORATION THAT IS USED AS HOUSING FOR PERSONS OF ELIGIBLE INCOME IS
EXEMPT FROM LEVY AND SALE BY VIRTUE OF AN EXECUTION;
[(ii)] (III) an execution or other judicial process may not issue
against the real property DESCRIBED IN ITEMS (I) AND (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH; [and]
[(iii)] (IV) a judgment against an authority is not a charge or lien on
the authority’s real property; AND
(V) A JUDGMENT AGAINST A NONPROFIT HOUSING
CORPORATION IS NOT A CHARGE OR LIEN ON THE NONPROFIT HOUSING
CORPORATION’S REAL PROPERTY THAT IS USED AS HOUSING FOR PERSONS OF
ELIGIBLE INCOME.
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not limit a right to foreclose or
otherwise enforce:
(i) a mortgage or deed of trust recorded against property of an
authority OR A NONPROFIT HOUSING CORPORATION; or
(ii) a pledge or lien given by an authority OR A NONPROFIT
HOUSING CORPORATION on its rents, fees, or revenues.

SENATE BILL 369
(3) This subsection does not deprive a political subdivision of its right to
collect money agreed to be paid in lieu of taxes in the same manner as taxes are now or may
be collected under State law and the laws of the political subdivision.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.